Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.037, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Contract for dental services. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may conduct a demonstration project to contract, on a prospective per capita payment basis, with an organization or organizations licensed under chapter 62C, 62D, or 62N for the provision of all dental care services beginning July 1, 1994, under the medical assistance and MinnesotaCare programs, or when necessary waivers are granted by the secretary of health and human services, whichever occurs later. The commissioner shall identify a geographic area or areas, including both urban and rural areas, where access to dental services has been inadequate, in which to conduct demonstration projects. The commissioner shall seek any federal waivers or approvals necessary to implement this section from the secretary of health and human services. new text begin (b) new text end The commissioner may exclude from participation in the demonstration project any or all groups currently excluded from participation in the prepaid medical assistance program under section 256B.69. Except for persons excluded from participation in the demonstration project, all persons who have been determined eligible for medical assistance and, if applicable, MinnesotaCare and reside in the designated geographic areas are required to enroll in a dental plan to receive their dental care services. Except for emergency services or out-of-plan services authorized by the dental plan, recipients must receive their dental services from dental care providers who are part of the dental plan provider network. new text begin (c) new text end The commissioner shall select either multiple dental plans or a single dental plan in a designated area. A dental plan under contract with the department must serve medical assistance recipients in a designated geographic area and may serve MinnesotaCare recipients. The commissioner may limit the number of dental plans with which the department contracts within a designated geographic area, taking into consideration the number of recipients within the designated geographic area; the number of potential dental plan contractors; the size of the provider network offered by dental plans; the dental care services offered by a dental plan; qualifications of dental plan personnel; accessibility of services to recipients; dental plan assurances of recipient confidentiality; dental plan marketing and enrollment activities; dental plan compliance with this section; dental plan performance under other contracts with the department to serve medical assistance or MinnesotaCare recipients; or any other factors necessary to provide the most economical care consistent with high standards of dental care. new text begin (d) new text end For purposes of this section, "dental plan" means an organization licensed under chapter 62C, 62D, or 62N that contracts with the department to provide covered dental care services to recipients on a prepaid capitation basis. "Emergency services" has the meaning given in section 256B.0625, subdivision 4. "Multiple dental plan area" means a designated area in which more than one dental plan is offered. "Participating provider" means a dentist or dental clinic who is employed by or under contract with a dental plan to provide dental care services to recipients. "Single dental plan area" means a designated area in which only one dental plan is available.